ckb/dictionaries/ckb.aff
####### Pronouns
SFX B Y 21
SFX B 0 یش .
SFX B 0 م .
SFX B 0 ت .
SFX B 0 ی .
SFX B 0 مان .
SFX B 0 تان .
SFX B 0 یان .
SFX B 0 ەوە .
SFX B 0 دا .
SFX B 0 ڕا .
SFX B 0 ش [ۆەا]
SFX B 0 شم [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شت [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شی [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شمان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شتان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 شیان [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 وە [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 وەش [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 ەوە [ۆاە]
SFX B 0 ەوەش [ۆاە]


# END OF AFF FILE
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright 2020 Sina Ahmadi <ahmadi.sina@outlook.com> <sinaahmadi.github.io/>
# =======================================================================================
